Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB64.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any state law or administrative regulation to the
contrary, Executive Order 2024-632, prohibiting state and federal funds to be used for the
practice of conversion therapy, shall not be valid as of the effective date of this Act.
Section 2. Whereas the General Assembly seeks to protect the rights of all
Kentuckians, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage
and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 11/19/2024 2:58 PM Jacketed